Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. Licensing of Commercial Fishing Crewmembers and Vessels.

Administrative Code. —

For commercial and subsistance fishing and private nonprofit salmon hatcheries, see 5 AAC, part 1.

Sec. 16.05.440.
Expiration date for licenses.

Licenses issued under AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.723

expire at the close of December 31 following their issuance or, for licenses that are valid for two years, after December 31 of the year after the year of issuance, and shall be renewed upon application and payment of the license fees required by AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.723

.

History.

(§ 2 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 19 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 6 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fish, Game and Wildlife Conservation, § 51 et seq.

36A C.J.S., Fish, §§ 26, 28, 30 et seq.

Sec. 16.05.450.
Issuance of licenses; disclosure for child support purposes.

The commissioner or an authorized agent shall issue a crewmember fishing license under AS

16.05.480

to each qualified person who files a written application at a place in the state designated by the commissioner, containing the reasonable information required by the commissioner together with the required fee. The commissioner shall require the reporting of the applicant’s social security number on the application. The application shall be simple in form and shall be executed by the applicant under the penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree.

The Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission shall issue a vessel license under AS

16.05.490

to each qualified vessel for which a written application has been filed, at a place in the state designated by the commission, containing the reasonable information required by the commission together with the required fee. The application shall be simple in form and shall be executed by the applicant under the penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Upon request, the commissioner shall provide a social security number provided under (a) of this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support enforcement agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 3 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 163 SLA 1962; am § 7 ch 31 SLA 1963; am §§ 1, 2 ch 92 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1972; am §§ 2, 3, 19 ch 105 SLA 1977; am E.O. No. 73 § 9 (1989); am § 15 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 15, 16 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 12, 13 ch 42 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Alaska” was inserted before “Commerical Fisheries Entry Commission” to correct a manifest error.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 15 AAC 116, art. 2.

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For House Resources Committee report on ch. 92, SLA 1971 (CSHB 191), see 1971 House Journal, p. 719.

Sec. 16.05.460.
Commissioner may appoint agents.

The commissioner may appoint qualified persons as agents to receive applications, issue licenses, and collect license fees under AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.480

.

History.

(§ 4 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 8 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 4 ch 105 SLA 1977; am E.O. No. 73 § 10 (1989); am § 3 ch 21 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For license officers, see 15 AAC 116, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.470.
Fee for issuance of licenses.

A person appointed by the commissioner to sell licenses under AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.480

, except salaried employees of the state, shall retain the sum of 10 percent of the fee for the issuance of a license. An agent shall transmit monthly to the commissioner all license fees collected by the agent, less the authorized commission, together with a full accounting of the fees. The commissioner shall make monthly remittances of the fees collected to the proper state official. The commissioner is not liable for defalcation or failure to account for the fees collected by an agent, but the commissioner shall require a bond in the sum the commissioner considers adequate, conditioned upon the faithful accounting of money collected.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 21 SLA 1990.]

Forms and fees under (a) of this section shall be transmitted to the commissioner by the last day of the month following the month in which the fees are collected. The commissioner may grant an extension of not more than 30 days if the agent establishes that

failure to grant an extension would impose an excessive financial hardship on the agent;

the fees collected by the agent for the period, including the amount that the agent is authorized to retain, totals less than $1,000; and

the cumulative amount of fees due from the agent, including the fees due for the current period, does not exceed $1,000.

The commissioner may assess a penalty against an agent who does not transmit fees within the time allowed under (c) of this section. The penalty is equal to one and one-half percent of the amount of fees due. The penalty may be assessed for each month or portion of a month that the fees are delinquent.

History.

(§ 5 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1977; am §§ 5, 6 ch 105 SLA 1977; am E.O. No. 73 § 11 (1989); am §§ 4, 5 ch 21 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For legislative intent relating to the amendment of (a) of this section by § 2, ch. 44, SLA 1999, see § 1, ch. 44, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.05.475.
Registration of fishing vessels.

A person may not employ a fishing vessel in the water of this state unless it is registered under the laws of the state. Vessels registered under the laws of another state, and persons residing in another state, are not excused from this provision.

The term “employ”, as used in this section, shall be defined by the Board of Fisheries through the adoption of regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The definition may include any activities involving the use or navigation of fishing vessels.

The term “registered under the laws of the state”, as used in this section, shall be defined by the Board of Fisheries through the adoption of regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). The definition may include any existing requirements regarding registration, licenses, permits, and similar matters imposed by law or regulation together with modifications of them and with any additional requirements the board finds necessary to maximize the authority of the state to apply and enforce fisheries regulations under 16 U.S.C. 1801-1882 (Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (P.L. 94-265, 90 Stat. 331)).

In this section “fishing vessel” means any vessel, boat, ship, or other craft that is used for, equipped to be used for, or of a type which is normally used for

fishing, or

aiding or assisting one or more vessels at sea in the performance of any activity relating to fishing, including, but not limited to, preparation, supply, storage, refrigeration, transportation, or processing.

History.

(§ 7 ch 105 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Magnuson-Stevens” was inserted before “Fishery Conservation and Management Act” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 16.05.480.
Commercial fishing license; disclosure for child support purposes.

A person engaged in commercial fishing shall obtain a commercial fishing license and shall retain the license in possession and readily available for inspection during fishing operations. An entry permit or interim-use permit entitles the holder to participate as a gear operator in the fishery for which the permit is issued and to participate as a crewmember in any fishery. A crewmember fishing license is not transferable and entitles the holder to participate as a crewmember in any fishery.

A person applying for a commercial fishing license under this section shall provide the person’s social security number. A person applying for a resident commercial fishing license under this section shall also provide proof of residence that the department requires by regulation.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 123 SLA 1978.]

Upon request, the department or the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission shall provide a social security number provided by an applicant for a license under this section to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or the child support agency of another state, for child support purposes authorized under law.

Except as provided under AS

16.05.470

and AS

23.35.060

, fees collected from the sale of crewmember fishing licenses under this section may be appropriated into the fish and game fund.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 27 SLA 2001.]

A resident engaged in commercial fishing who is 11 years of age or older and who does not hold an entry permit or an interim-use permit shall, except as provided in (i) of this section, pay a fee of $60 for an annual crewmember fishing license. A resident engaged in commercial fishing who is less than 11 years of age and who does not hold an entry permit or an interim-use permit shall pay an annual fee of $5.

A nonresident engaged in commercial fishing who is 11 years of age or older and who does not hold an entry permit or an interim-use permit shall, except as provided in (i) of this section, pay a base fee of $60 for an annual crewmember fishing license, plus an amount, established by the department by regulation, that is as close as is practicable to the maximum allowed by law. A nonresident engaged in commercial fishing who is less than 11 years of age and who does not hold an entry permit or an interim-use permit shall pay an annual base fee of $5 plus an amount, established by the department by regulation, that is as close as is practicable to the maximum allowed by law.

Notwithstanding (g) and (h) of this section, a resident or nonresident engaged in commercial fishing who does not hold an entry permit or an interim-use permit may obtain one seven-day crewmember fishing license under this subsection annually. A person who obtains a seven-day license is not eligible for another seven-day license in the same license year; however, if a person who obtains a seven-day license pays the full fee for an annual crewmember fishing license under (g) or (h) of this section during the same license year, the person is entitled to receive a refund of the fee for the seven-day license. The department shall adopt regulations establishing a refund procedure. During the period for which the seven-day license is valid, a person who holds a seven-day license may not engage in fishing with a rod and reel while present on a commercial fishing vessel. The fee for a seven-day license is $30.

In this section, “commercial fishing license” includes an entry permit and an interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43 and a crewmember fishing license.

History.

(§ 6 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 19 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1968; am § 8 ch 105 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 2, 12 ch 123 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1982; am §§ 17, 18 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 3, 4 ch 44 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2, 7 ch 27 SLA 2001; am §§ 1, 2 ch 37 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 59 SLA 2005; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 68 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (d) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Subsection (i) was enacted as (j) and relettered in 2005, at which time former subsection (i) was relettered as subsection (j).

Cross references. —

For legislative intent relating to the enactment of subsection (e), see § 1, ch. 44, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Thirty-nine percent of the fees collected under this section is deposited in the fishermen’s fund, AS

23.35.060

.
For opinions of the Attorney General regarding constitutional limits on altering the amount of a license fee upon which a dedicated fund is based, see annotations following art. IX, § 7 in the Alaska Constitution pamphlet.

Sections 6, 14, and 17, ch. 54, SLA 2001, which were to amend (b) and repeal (d) of this section effective July 1, 2003, were repealed by § 3, ch. 37, SLA 2003.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Discrimination against aliens and nonresidents in issuance of fishing licenses. See 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 15.

Employees of shore-based floating canneries are not required to have a commercial fishing license, but employees of floating canneries are required to have a commercial fishing license.
February 22, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.05.490.
Vessel license.

As a condition to delivery or landing of fish or engaging in commercial fishing in the state, a license is required for a commercial vessel.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1963; am § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.495.
Vessel license exemption.

A vessel used exclusively for the commercial capture of salmon in commercial salmon administrative management areas that include state water between the latitude of Point Romanof and the latitude of Cape Newenham, and state water surrounding Nunivak Island, or at a set net site, is exempt from the licensing requirements of AS

16.05.490

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1983; am § 16 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Administrative Code. —

For permits and vessel license required, see 20 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 16.05.500.
Revocation of vessel license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 16.05.510.
Unlicensed vessel unlawful.

A person may not operate a vessel to which AS

16.05.490

—

16.05.530

apply without a vessel license, whether the absence of a vessel license results from initial failure to purchase or from another reason.

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 11 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 1993)

Sec. 16.05.520.
Number plate.

The vessel license includes a permanent number plate. The number plate shall be accompanied by a tab affixed to the number plate designating the year to be fished. A number plate is not transferable, and the number plate shall be considered a permanent fixture upon the vessel upon which the number plate is originally placed. The number plate shall be securely fastened well forward on the port side in plain sight. On a vessel with a superstructure, the number plate shall be fastened on the port side of the superstructure. A number plate remains the property of the state. The Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission may establish by regulation a reasonable fee for the initial issuance of a permanent number plate. If a permanent number plate is accidentally defaced, mutilated, destroyed, or lost, the person owning or operating the vessel shall immediately apply for and may obtain a duplicate upon furnishing the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission with the pertinent facts and a payment of a reasonable fee established by the commission by regulation that is not less than $2.

If a vessel carrying a number plate is lost, destroyed, or sold, the owner shall immediately report the loss, destruction, or sale to the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission.

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 16 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 9 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Alaska” was inserted before “Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 16.05.530.
Renewal of vessel license.

Upon payment of the vessel license fee and filing of the name and address of the owner of the vessel or the owner’s authorized agent, the name and number of the vessel, a description of the vessel, the vessel license number, if any, the area to be fished, and other reasonable information required by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission, the commission shall issue a permanent number plate and a vessel license. If the vessel has a permanent number plate, the commission shall issue a vessel license and tab designating the year the license is valid. The tab shall be placed in the space provided on the permanent number plate.

For calendar year 2006 and following years, the annual fee for a vessel license issued or renewed under this section is set according to the overall length, as defined by the United States Coast Guard, of the vessel under the following schedule:

0 — 25 feet . . . . . $24

over 25 feet — 50 feet . . . . . 60

over 50 feet — 75 feet . . . . . 120

over 75 feet — 100 feet . . . . . 225

over 100 feet — 125 feet . . . . . 300

over 125 feet — 150 feet . . . . . 375

over 150 feet — 175 feet . . . . . 450

over 175 feet — 200 feet . . . . . 525

over 200 feet — 225 feet . . . . . 600

over 225 feet — 250 feet . . . . . 675

over 250 feet — 275 feet . . . . . 750

over 275 feet — 300 feet . . . . . 825

over 300 feet . . . . . 900.

History.

(§ 7 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 20 ch 131 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 31 SLA 1963; am § 10 ch 105 SLA 1977; am §§ 20, 21 ch 81 SLA 1984; am §§ 2, 3 ch 71 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Alaska” was inserted before “Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission” to correct a manifest error.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 1, ch. 71, SLA 1995 states that it is the intent of the legislature that the revenue generated by the amendments made by ch. 71, SLA 1995 “be appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for the management, rehabilitation, enhancement, development, and scientific study of the commercial fishery resources of the state.”

Sec. 16.05.536.
Persons eligible for gear licenses. [Repealed, § 12 ch 71 SLA 1972.]

Secs. 16.05.540 — 16.05.610.
Limitation on issuance of fishing gear licenses; issuance of licenses for various types of fishing gear. [Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 16.05.620.
Otter trawl license. [Repealed, § 2 ch 159 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 16.05.630.
Shellfish pot license. [Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 16.05.632.
Identification of shellfish pots or buoys, or both, used in the taking of king crab and requirements for buoys.

Registration tags for the identification of shellfish pots or buoys, or both, used in the taking of king crab are required in areas in which the board has regulations limiting the total amount of shellfish pots allowed per vessel. Registration tags shall

be issued by the department under regulations adopted by the board;

be nontransferable;

be individually numbered, designating the year of issuance;

be permanently affixed to each shellfish pot or buoy, or both, used in the taking of king crab, whichever in the determination of the board is appropriate for identification, and in a manner determined to be appropriate by the board;

conform to other requirements determined to be appropriate by the board; and

be issued and renewed for a fee equal to the cost of obtaining the registration tags plus reasonable administrative costs, under procedures determined to be appropriate by the department.

The unauthorized production, reproduction, sale, exchange, distribution, or use of registration tags required in (a) of this section is prohibited.

In addition to meeting other requirements imposed by law, each shellfish pot used in the taking of king crab shall be connected to one durable “sea lion” buoy of an appropriate type and diameter as specified by the board. The buoy shall conform to other specifications determined to be appropriate by the board.

[Repealed, § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989.]

In this section,

“board” means the Board of Fisheries;

“registration tags” means any tag, tape, or other identification device or method determined to be appropriate by the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1977; § 65 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 61 ch 50 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (e) was enacted as (d). Relettered in 1987.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the enactment of this section, see § 1, ch. 103, SLA 1977 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 34, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 34, art. 6.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 34, art. 8.

For Registration Area Q (Bering Sea), see 5 AAC 34, art. 14.

For Registration Area A (Southeastern), see 5 AAC 35, art. 5.

For Registration Area D (Yakutat), see 5 AAC 35, art. 6.

For Registration Area E (Prince William Sound), see 5 AAC 35, art. 7.

For Registration Area H (Cook Inlet), see 5 AAC 35, art. 8.

For Registration Area J (Westward), see 5 AAC 35, art. 10.

Secs. 16.05.640 — 16.05.650.
Clam digger’s license; licensing of small commercial operations. [Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 16.05.660.
License exemption.

A person may, by complying with the $5 license requirement of
AS

16.05.340(a)(6)

, take not more than 2,000 pounds each of tom cod, blue cod, smelt, pickerel, white fish, and spider crab a year from waters of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1963; am § 66 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 28 SLA 1990)

Sec. 16.05.662.
Fishing derbies.

The commissioner may issue without cost a permit to a fishing derby association that has complied with the provisions of AS

05.15.100

—

05.15.180

to sell or offer for sale sport caught fish obtained as a direct result of a fishing derby.

In this section “fishing derby association” means a civic, service, or charitable organization in the state, not for pecuniary profit, whose primary purpose is to promote interest in fishing for recreational purposes and which has been in existence for five years before applying for a permit under (a) of this section, but does not include an organization formed or operated for gaming or gambling purposes.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly
AS

16.05.940

(13). Renumbered in 1992, at which time minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization.

Sec. 16.05.665.
Falsification of application for license.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement as to a material fact on an application for a license under AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.660

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

A license issued under AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.660

to a person convicted under (a) of this section is void.

A person whose license is void under (a) and (b) of this section may not obtain another license of the same type for a period of not less than two nor more than three years from the date of conviction by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1965)

Sec. 16.05.670.
Fishing gear license in general. [Repealed, § 19 ch 105 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 16.05.671.
Transportation and sale of certain fish by an agent of the fisherman who caught the fish.

A person may transport and sell commercially taken fish as the agent of the commercial fisherman who caught the fish if the person holds a fish transporter permit issued by the commissioner under this section.

The commissioner may issue a fish transporter permit to a natural person. A fish transporter permit authorizes the permittee to transport and sell commercially taken fish as the agent of the commercial fisherman who caught the fish. A fish transporter may not buy or process fish received for transport unless the fish transporter also holds the appropriate licenses, permits, and other authorizations required to buy or process fish.

A person who applies for a fish transporter permit under this section shall provide the person’s social security number to the department. Upon request of the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

, or a child support agency of another state, the department shall provide a social security number provided by an applicant for a fish transporter permit under this section to that agency for child support purposes authorized under law.

A commercial fisherman may authorize a fish transporter to transport and sell fish on behalf of the fisherman as the agent of the fisherman. The fish transporter shall complete a fish ticket in accordance with procedures prescribed by the department for each fisherman who transfers fish to the fish transporter. The fish ticket must accompany the fish transferred to the fish transporter while the fish are in possession of the fish transporter. The fish transporter shall present the fish ticket for inspection upon request by a peace officer or representative of the commissioner. The fish transporter shall present the fish ticket to the buyer of the fish at the time of sale. The buyer of the fish shall complete the fish ticket by inserting the buyer’s information as required by the department, including the weight or count of fish purchased. The buyer shall return a copy of the fish ticket to the commercial fisherman on whose behalf the fish are sold.

A commercial fisherman who transfers fish to a fish transporter to transport and sell fish on behalf of the fisherman shall provide the fish transporter with all required information that the fisherman would have to provide to the buyer of the fish if the fisherman were to personally sell the fish to the buyer. The fish transporter who sells fish as the agent of a commercial fisherman shall provide all information to the buyer of the fish that the commercial fisherman would have to provide to the buyer if the fisherman were to personally sell the fish.

A commercial fisherman may also hold a fish transporter permit. A commercial fisherman who holds a fish transporter permit may simultaneously transport or sell fish that the fisherman caught as well as fish caught by other commercial fishermen. A commercial fisherman who is simultaneously operating as a fish transporter shall physically possess

the fish ticket completed under (d) of this section for the fish being transported or sold on behalf of another fisherman; and

other documentation that may be prescribed by the commissioner by regulation.

The commissioner may adopt regulations the commissioner considers necessary to implement this section. The regulations may not conflict with regulations or management plans adopted by the Board of Fisheries. The regulations may include

criteria for determining areas or fisheries for which transporter permits may not be issued because

fish transporter operations may alter harvest rates for the area or fishery to the extent that conservation of the resource is jeopardized, may significantly impair the ability of the department to accurately determine catch or effort levels, or may interfere with fishery management, allocation, or enforcement matters;

a fishery is managed through allocations of the harvest to individuals, such as trip limits or quota shares; or

combining of catches by multiple fishermen on a vessel may impair the ability of the department to accurately determine the incidental catch by each fisherman;

requirements for timely and accurate reporting and record keeping; or

procedures to maintain quality of harvested resources.

Fish transferred to the possession of a fish transporter under the authority of this section are property of the fisherman who caught the fish until the fish are sold to a buyer by the fish transporter on behalf of the fisherman.

In this section, “fish” means fish legally harvested and retained in salmon, herring, or Pacific cod fisheries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 112 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 16.05.675.
Landing permits.

A person who does not hold a limited entry permit or interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43 or a fish transporter permit issued under AS

16.05.671

may not deliver or land fish in the state unless the person

holds a valid federal permit to operate commercial fishing gear in the fishery conservation zone; and

has been issued a landing permit by the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission.

The commissioner may by regulation establish eligibility requirements for the issuance of a landing permit.

The commissioner may authorize the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission to issue landing permits for a fishery if the commissioner has made a written finding that the issuance of landing permits for that fishery is consistent with state resource conservation and management goals.

History.

(§ 1 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Alaska” was inserted before “Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission” to correct a manifest error.

Sec. 16.05.680.
Unlawful practices.

It is unlawful for a person, or an agent or representative of the person,

to employ, in the harvesting, transporting, or purchasing of fish, a fisherman who neither is licensed under AS

16.05.480

nor is the holder of a permit issued under AS 16.43;

to purchase fish from a person who is not

the holder of a limited entry, interim-use, or landing permit issued under AS 16.43;

a fish transporter who is selling the fish as the agent of the holder of a limited entry, interim-use, or landing permit issued under AS 16.43; or

exempt under AS

16.05.660

; or

to purchase fish from an association other than one to which a permit has been issued under AS

16.05.662

.

A person may not sell salmon that was not harvested under the authority of the entry permit, interim-use permit, or landing permit under which the salmon is sold. For purposes of this subsection, salmon sold by a fish transporter on behalf of the commercial fisherman who harvested the salmon is salmon harvested under the authority of the limited entry, interim-use, or landing permit under which the salmon is sold.

History.

(§ 10 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 96 SLA 1963; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 1970; am § 11 ch 105 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 145 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 112 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For additional penalty provisions related to unlawful purchase of fish, see AS

16.10.265

.

Sec. 16.05.685.
Processing on commercial king crab fishing vessels.

Crab of any species may not be processed on a commercial crab fishing vessel unless

the vessel remains within one registration area from the time the crab is caught to the time of dock delivery;

the operator of the vessel notifies the department of proposed changes in location before moving to another registration area; and

the operator of the vessel provides quarters for inspectors of the department who may inspect the crab catch on the vessel at any time.

The restrictions set out in (a) of this section do not apply to processing aboard the fishing vessel for and as donations to charity, for consumption aboard the vessel, or for dockside retail sales from the vessel.

In this section,

“process” means to butcher, cook, chill, or freeze crab for commercial use;

“registration area” means a specific king crab registration area as designated by regulation of the Board of Fisheries.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 1974; am § 12 ch 206 SLA 1975; am § 17 ch 132 SLA 1984)

Sec. 16.05.690.
Record of purchases.

Each buyer of fish shall keep a record of each purchase showing the name or number of the vessel from which the catch involved is taken, the date of landing, vessel license number, pounds purchased of each species, number of each species, and the Department of Fish and Game statistical area in which the fish were taken, and other information the department requires. Records may be kept on forms provided by the department. Each person charged with keeping the records shall report them to the department in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

A person may not knowingly enter false information on a fish ticket or supply false information to a person who is recording information on a fish ticket.

[Repealed, § 1 ch 13 SLA 1997.]

History.

(§ 10 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 78 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 62 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For Southeastern Alaska Area (Registration Area A), see 5 AAC 27, art. 4.

For Kodiak Area (Registration Area K), see 5 AAC 27, art. 8.

For Bristol Bay Area (Registration Area T), see 5 AAC 27, art. 12.

For Kuskokwim Area (Registration Area W), see 5 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 16.05.700.
Penalty for violation of AS 16.05.680 and 16.05.690. [Repealed, § 25 ch 127 SLA 1974.]

Sec. 16.05.710.
Suspension of commercial license and entry permit.

Upon the conviction of a person for a misdemeanor or felony violation of a commercial fishing law of this state, in a fishery other than a commercial salmon fishery, the court, in addition to other penalties imposed by law,

may suspend one or more of the person’s commercial fishing privileges and licenses for a period of not more than one year if the conviction is the person’s first or second misdemeanor or felony conviction within a 10-year period for violating a commercial fishing law of this state, in a fishery other than a commercial salmon fishery, or another jurisdiction; or

shall suspend one or more of the person’s commercial fishing privileges and licenses for a period of not more than three years if the conviction is the person’s third or subsequent misdemeanor or felony conviction within a 10-year period for violating a commercial fishing law of this state, in a fishery other than a commercial salmon fishery, or another jurisdiction.

Upon a first conviction of a person for a violation of AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.130

in which the property is commercial fishing gear as defined in AS

16.43.990

, the court shall, in addition to the penalty imposed by law, suspend one or more of the person’s commercial fishing privileges and licenses for one year. Upon a second or subsequent conviction for a violation of AS

11.46.120

—

11.46.130

or a similar law of another jurisdiction in which the property is commercial fishing gear as defined in AS

16.43.990

, the court shall, in addition to the penalty imposed by law, suspend one or more of the person’s commercial fishing privileges and licenses for two years.

If proceedings in which commercial fishing privileges or licenses may be suspended under this section are pending against a limited entry permit holder, the permit holder’s limited entry permit may not be permanently transferred, unless allowed by order of the court in which the proceedings are pending, and a permanent transfer of the permit, unless allowed by order of the court, is void. During the period for which a limited entry permit or the permit holder’s right to obtain a limited entry permit or to engage in an activity for which a limited entry permit is required is suspended under this section, a permit card may not be issued to the permit holder and the permit holder’s permit may not be transferred or sold.

In this section,

“commercial fishing law” means a statute or regulation that regulates the conduct of a person engaged in commercial fishing activities by establishing requirements relating to fishing licenses and permits; catch records and reports; size, nature, or use of fishing vessels, sites, and gear; time, place, or manner of taking fishery resources; possession, transportation, sale, barter, or waste of fishery resources; or other aspects of commercial fishing;

“commercial fishing license” means a limited entry permit or a crew member license;

“commercial fishing privilege” means the privilege of participating in an activity for which a commercial fishing license is required and the privilege of obtaining a commercial fishing license;

“limited entry permit” means an entry permit or an interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43.

History.

(§ 11 art III ch 94 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1966; am § 3 ch 73 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 46 SLA 1988; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 63 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 110 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For suspensions for violations of fishing law in the commercial salmon fisheries, see AS

16.43.860

. For applicability of the amendment to subsection (a) made by § 2, ch. 110, SLA 1998, see § 12, ch. 110, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.05.720.
Penalties.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 46 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 16.05.722.
Strict liability commercial fishing penalties.

A person who without any culpable mental state violates AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.690

, or a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the department governing commercial fishing, is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than

$3,000 for a first conviction;

$6,000 for a second conviction or for a subsequent conviction not described in (3) of this subsection; and

$9,000 for a third or subsequent conviction within a 10-year period.

In addition, the court shall order forfeiture of any fish, or its fair market value, taken or retained as a result of the commission of the violation. For purposes of this subsection, it is a rebuttable presumption that all fish found on board a fishing vessel used in or in aid of a violation, or found at the fishing site, were taken or retained in violation of AS

16.05.440

—

16.05.690

or a commercial fisheries regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the department. It is the defendant’s burden to show by a preponderance of the evidence that fish on board or at the site were lawfully taken and retained.

A person charged with a violation under this section is entitled to a trial by court but not by jury, and is not entitled to representation at public expense.

History.

(§ 3 ch 46 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For prohibitions, see 5 AAC 38, art. 4.